test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-63hingaemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - hingämä: # Verb (63) '/(eng) to  /(fin) ' - partial paradigm
     hingämä+V+Inf/mA: hingämä
     hingämä+V+Inf: hingädäq
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hingä
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hingät, hingädeq]
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hingäs
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hingämiq
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hingätiq
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hingäseq
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hingädä
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hingätät, hingätädeq]
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hingätäs
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hingätämiq
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hingätätiq
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hingätäseq

     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [hingsi, hingässi]
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hingsit, hingsiq, hingsideq, hingässit, hingässiq, hingässideq]
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hingäsʼ
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [hingsimiq, hingässimiq]
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [hingsitiq, hingässitiq]
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hingsiq, hingsiväq, hingässiq, hingässiväq]
     hingämä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: hingä
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hingädi
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hingätit, hingädiq, hingätideq]
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hingäti
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hingätimiq
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hingätitiq
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hingädiq, hingätiväq]
     hingämä+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: hingädä

     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hingäv
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: hingävä
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: hingävät
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: hingävähe
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hingäväq
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [hingävide, hingäviide]
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [hingävit, hingäviid]
     hingämä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [hingävihe, hingäviihe]
                    
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hingätäv
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: hingätävä
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: hingätävät
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: hingätävähe
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: hingätäväq
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [hingätävide, hingätäviide]
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [hingätävit, hingätäviid]
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [hingätävihe, hingätäviihe]

     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: hingänüq
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: hingänü
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: hingänüt
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: hingänühe
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hingänüq
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [hingänüide, hingänüisi]
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [hingänüid, hingänüisi]
     hingämä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [hingänüihe, hingänüisihe]

     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [hingät, hingätü]
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: hingädü
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: hingätüt
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: hingätühe
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: hingädüq
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [hingätüide, hingätüisi]
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [hingätüid, hingätüisi]
     hingämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [hingätüihe, hingätüisihe]
